Mississippi, session 2026, SB2259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 25-41-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-41-5.  (1)  All official meetings of any public body, unless otherwise provided in this chapter or in the Constitutions of the United States of America or the State of Mississippi, are declared to be public meetings and shall be open to the public at all times unless declared an executive session as provided in Section 25-41-7. (2)  A public body may conduct any meeting through teleconference or video means.  A quorum of a public body as prescribed by law may be at different locations for the purpose of conducting a meeting through teleconference or video means provided that the equipment used is located at the place where the public body normally meets or at a public location specified in any notice of a special meeting, and provided that the equipment allows all members of the public body and members of the public who attend the meeting to hear the deliberations of the public body. (3)  An agenda and materials that will be distributed to members of the public body and that have been made available to the staff of the public body in sufficient time for duplication and forwarding to the members of the public body shall be made available to the public at the time of the meeting.  Votes taken during any meeting conducted through teleconference or video means shall be taken in a manner that is clearly audible or visible to all members of the public body and to members of the public present at the public location. (4)  In addition to the requirements of subsections (1), (2) and (3) of this section, except for executive sessions and other meetings expressly authorized by law to be closed, regular and special meetings of all public bodies shall be broadcast via video livestreaming applications on the front page of the official website of each respective public body or on a designated government channel.  Public notices of such meetings shall also be broadcast online in the same manner and shall contain the agenda of matters to be discussed at the respective meeting in sufficient detail as to notify the public of what will be discussed, and the online link shall be included in all public notices.  Each public body shall transmit its online streaming link to the Department of Finance and Administration which shall maintain a comprehensive list of website streaming links of all public bodies for public use.  Any action of a public body taken at a meeting is void and of no effect if the public body fails to use due diligence to comply with the public notice of the agenda to be discussed or fails to use due diligence to comply with the livestreaming broadcasting requirement pursuant to this subsection (4).  In the event that technological difficulties make the livestreaming requirements established by this subsection (4) impracticable, public bodies shall record the meeting, and then post the recording of the meeting and the minutes of the meeting on the front page of the official website of each respective public body, or on a designated government channel, as soon as reasonably possible.  The meeting minutes posted on the front page of the official website of each respective public body, or on a designated government channel, should disclose the reason(s) why the meeting was not successfully livestreamed.  This subsection (4) shall be applicable to a political subdivision or municipal corporation of the state or any of the administrative units of a political subdivision or municipal corporation.  This subsection (4) shall not apply to the Legislature or any of its component units, the judiciary or any of its component units.  This subsection (4) may be cited and referred to as "The Peoples Access Act." (5)  In regard to the requirements provided in subsection (4) of this section: (a)  Cities shall be required to comply by January 1, 2027; (b)  Towns shall be required to comply by July 1, 2027; and (c)  Villages and hamlets shall be required to comply by January 1, 2028. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after January 1, 2027.